District of Columbia statutes.
1-301.88

Authority to administer oaths.

The Attorney General, Chief Deputy Attorney General, Deputy Attorneys General, and Assistant Attorneys General are authorized to administer oaths and affirmations in the discharge of their official duties within the District of Columbia.

May 27, 2010, D.C. Law 18-160, § 108, 57 DCR 3012